Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-219 REPEALED. L 2012, c 250, §13.

Note

The 2012 repeal of this section shall not apply to any
proceedings in which a member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation
prior to July 1, 2012. L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next